Missouri, session 2026, SB1356.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Sections 610.120 and 610.140, RSMo, are
2 repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
3 known as sections 610.120 and 610.140, to read as follows:
1 610.120. 1. Except as otherwise provided under
2 section 610.124, records required to be closed shall [not]
3 be destroyed within six months of being closed; [they] the
4 record of arrest shall be closed and shall be inaccessible
5 to the general public and to all persons other than the
6 defendant except as provided in this section and chapter
7 43. [Closed records shall be available to: criminal justice
8 agencies for the administration of criminal justice pursuant
9 to section 43.500, criminal justice employment, screening
10 persons with access to criminal justice facilities,
11 procedures, and sensitive information; to law enforcement
12 agencies for issuance or renewal of a license, permit,
13 certification, or registration of authority from such agency
14 including but not limited to watchmen, security personnel,
15 and private investigators; those agencies authorized by
16 chapter 43 and applicable state law when submitting
17 fingerprints to the central repository; the sentencing
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1356 2
18 advisory commission created in section 558.019 for the
19 purpose of studying sentencing practices in accordance with
20 chapter 43; to qualified entities for the purpose of
21 screening providers defined in chapter 43; the department of
22 revenue for driver license administration; the department of
23 public safety for the purposes of determining eligibility
24 for crime victims' compensation pursuant to sections 595.010
25 to 595.075, department of health and senior services for the
26 purpose of licensing and regulating facilities and
27 regulating in-home services provider agencies and federal
28 agencies for purposes of criminal justice administration,
29 criminal justice employment, child, elderly, or disabled
30 care, and for such investigative purposes as authorized by
31 law or presidential executive order.]
32 2. [These records shall be made available only for the
33 purposes and to the entities listed in this section. A
34 criminal justice agency receiving a request for criminal
35 history information under its control may require positive
36 identification, to include fingerprints of the subject of
37 the record search, prior to releasing closed record
38 information.] Dissemination of closed and open records from
39 the Missouri criminal records repository shall be in
40 accordance with section 43.509. All records which are
41 closed records shall be removed from the records of the
42 courts, administrative agencies, and law enforcement
43 agencies which are available to the public [and shall be
44 kept in separate records which are to be held confidential
45 and, where possible, pages of the public record shall be
46 retyped or rewritten omitting those portions of the record
47 which deal with the defendant's case]. If [retyping or
48 rewriting] destruction of the record is not feasible because
49 of the permanent nature of the record books, such record

SB 1356 3
50 entries shall be blacked out [and recopied in a confidential
51 book].
1 610.140. 1. For the purposes of this section, the
2 following terms mean:
3 (1) "Court", any Missouri municipal, associate
4 circuit, or circuit court;
5 (2) "Crime", any offense, violation, or infraction of
6 Missouri state, county, municipal, or administrative law;
7 (3) "Prosecutor" or "prosecuting attorney", the
8 prosecuting attorney, circuit attorney, or municipal
9 prosecuting attorney.
10 2. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and
11 subject to the provisions of this section, any person may
12 apply to any court in which such person was charged or found
13 guilty of any crimes for an order to expunge records of such
14 arrest, plea, trial, or conviction.
15 (2) Subject to the limitations of subsection 13 of
16 this section, a person may apply to have one or more crimes
17 expunged if each such crime occurred within the state of
18 Missouri and was prosecuted under the jurisdiction of a
19 Missouri court, so long as such person lists all the crimes
20 he or she is seeking to have expunged in the petition and so
21 long as all such crimes are not excluded under subsection 3
22 of this section.
23 (3) If the crimes sought to be expunged were committed
24 as part of the same course of criminal conduct, the person
25 may include all such related crimes in the petition,
26 regardless of the limits of subsection 13 of this section,
27 and those related crimes shall only count as the highest
28 level for the purpose of determining current and future
29 eligibility for expungement.

SB 1356 4
30 3. The following crimes shall not be eligible for
31 expungement under this section:
32 (1) Any class A felony offense;
33 (2) Any dangerous felony as that term is defined in
34 section 556.061;
35 (3) Any offense that requires registration as a sex
36 offender;
37 (4) Any felony offense where death is an element of
38 the offense;
39 (5) Any felony offense of assault; misdemeanor or
40 felony offense of domestic assault; or felony offense of
41 kidnapping;
42 (6) Any offense listed, previously listed, or is a
43 successor to an offense in chapter 566 or section 105.454,
44 105.478, 115.631, 130.028, 188.030, 188.080, 191.677,
45 194.425, 217.385, 334.245, 375.991, 389.653, 455.085,
46 455.538, 557.035, 565.120, 565.130, 565.156, 566.093,
47 566.111, 566.115, 566.116, 568.020, 568.030, 568.032,
48 568.045, 568.060, 568.065, 568.175, 569.040, 569.050,
49 569.055, 569.060, 569.065, 569.067, 569.072, 569.160,
50 570.025, 570.090, 570.180, 570.223, 570.224, 570.310,
51 571.020, 571.060, 571.063, 571.070, 571.072, 571.150,
52 573.200, 573.205, 574.070, 574.105, 574.115, 574.120,
53 574.130, 574.140, 575.040, 575.095, 575.153, 575.155,
54 575.157, 575.159, 575.195, 575.200, 575.210, 575.220,
55 575.230, 575.240, 575.353, 577.078, 577.703, 577.706, or
56 632.520;
57 (7) Any offense eligible for expungement under section
58 610.130;
59 (8) Any intoxication-related traffic or boating
60 offense as defined in section 577.001, or any offense of

SB 1356 5
61 operating an aircraft with an excessive blood alcohol
62 content or while in an intoxicated condition;
63 (9) Any ordinance violation that is the substantial
64 equivalent of any offense that is not eligible for
65 expungement under this section;
66 (10) Any violation of any state law or county or
67 municipal ordinance regulating the operation of motor
68 vehicles when committed by an individual who has been issued
69 a commercial driver's license or is required to possess a
70 commercial driver's license issued by this state or any
71 other state; and
72 (11) Any offense of section 571.030, except any
73 offense under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section
74 571.030 where the person was convicted or found guilty prior
75 to January 1, 2017, or any offense under subdivision (4) of
76 subsection 1 of section 571.030.
77 4. The petition shall name as defendants all law
78 enforcement agencies, courts, prosecuting or circuit
79 attorneys, central state repositories of criminal records,
80 or others who the petitioner has reason to believe may
81 possess the records subject to expungement for each of the
82 crimes listed in the petition. The court's order of
83 expungement shall not affect any person or entity not named
84 as a defendant in the action.
85 5. The petition shall include the following
86 information:
87 (1) The petitioner's:
88 (a) Full name;
89 (b) Sex;
90 (c) Race;
91 (d) Driver's license number, if applicable; and
92 (e) Current address;

SB 1356 6
93 (2) Each crime for which the petitioner is requesting
94 expungement;
95 (3) The approximate date the petitioner was charged
96 for each crime; and
97 (4) The name of the county where the petitioner was
98 charged for each crime and if any of the crimes occurred in
99 a municipality, the name of the municipality for each crime;
100 and
101 (5) The case number and name of the court for each
102 crime.
103 6. The clerk of the court shall give notice of the
104 filing of the petition to the office of the prosecuting
105 attorney that prosecuted the crimes listed in the petition.
106 If the prosecuting attorney objects to the petition for
107 expungement, he or she shall do so in writing within thirty
108 days after receipt of service. Unless otherwise agreed upon
109 by the parties, the court shall hold a hearing within sixty
110 days after any written objection is filed, giving reasonable
111 notice of the hearing to the petitioner. If no objection
112 has been filed within thirty days after receipt of service,
113 the court may set a hearing on the matter and shall give
114 reasonable notice of the hearing to each entity named in the
115 petition. At any hearing, the court may accept evidence and
116 hear testimony on, and may consider, the following criteria
117 for each of the crimes listed in the petition for
118 expungement:
119 (1) At the time the petition is filed, it has been at
120 least three years if the offense is a felony, or at least
121 one year if the offense is a misdemeanor, municipal
122 violation, or infraction, from the date the petitioner
123 completed any authorized disposition imposed under section
124 557.011 for each crime listed in the petition;

SB 1356 7
125 (2) At the time the petition is filed, the person has
126 not been found guilty of any other misdemeanor or felony,
127 not including violations of the traffic regulations provided
128 under chapters 301, 302, 303, 304, and 307, during the time
129 period specified for the underlying crime in subdivision (1)
130 of this subsection;
131 (3) The person has satisfied all obligations relating
132 to any such disposition, including the payment of any fines
133 or restitution;
134 (4) The person does not have charges pending;
135 (5) The petitioner's habits and conduct demonstrate
136 that the petitioner is not a threat to the public safety of
137 the state; and
138 (6) The expungement is consistent with the public
139 welfare and the interests of justice warrant the expungement.
140 A pleading by the petitioner that such petitioner meets the
141 requirements of subdivisions (5) and (6) of this subsection
142 shall create a rebuttable presumption that the expungement
143 is warranted so long as the criteria contained in
144 subdivisions (1) to (4) of this subsection are otherwise
145 satisfied. The burden shall shift to the prosecuting
146 attorney or circuit attorney to rebut the presumption. A
147 victim of a crime listed in the petition shall have an
148 opportunity to be heard at any hearing held under this
149 section. A court may find that the continuing impact of the
150 offense upon the victim rebuts the presumption that
151 expungement is warranted.
152 7. A petition to expunge records related to an arrest
153 for an eligible crime may be made in accordance with the
154 provisions of this section to a court of competent
155 jurisdiction in the county where the petitioner was arrested

SB 1356 8
156 no earlier than eighteen months from the date of arrest;
157 provided that, during such time, the petitioner has not been
158 charged and the petitioner has not been found guilty of any
159 misdemeanor or felony offense.
160 8. If the court determines that such person meets all
161 the criteria set forth in subsection 6 of this section for
162 each of the crimes listed in the petition for expungement,
163 the court shall enter an order of expungement. In all cases
164 under this section, the court shall issue an order of
165 expungement or dismissal within six months of the filing of
166 the petition. A copy of the order of expungement shall be
167 provided to the petitioner and each entity possessing
168 records subject to the order, and, upon receipt of the
169 order, each entity shall [close] destroy any record, except
170 the arrest record, in its possession relating to any crime
171 listed in the petition, in the manner established by section
172 610.120. The records and files maintained in any
173 administrative or court proceeding in a municipal,
174 associate, or circuit court for any crime ordered expunged
175 under this section shall be confidential and only available
176 to the parties or by order of the court for good cause
177 shown. The central repository shall request the Federal
178 Bureau of Investigation to expunge the records from its
179 files.
180 9. The order shall not limit any of the petitioner's
181 rights that were restricted as a collateral consequence of
182 such person's criminal record, and such rights shall be
183 restored upon issuance of the order of expungement. Except
184 as otherwise provided under this section, the effect of such
185 order shall be to fully restore the civil rights of such
186 person to the status he or she occupied prior to such
187 arrests, pleas, trials, or convictions as if such events had

SB 1356 9
188 never taken place. This includes fully restoring the civil
189 rights of a person to the right to vote, the right to hold
190 public office, and to serve as a juror. For purposes of 18
191 U.S.C. Section 921(a)(33)(B)(ii), an order of expungement
192 granted pursuant to this section shall be considered a
193 complete removal of all effects of the expunged conviction.
194 Except as otherwise provided under this section, the effect
195 of such order shall be to restore such person to the status
196 he or she occupied prior to such arrests, pleas, trials, or
197 convictions as if such events had never taken place. No
198 person as to whom such order has been entered shall be held
199 thereafter under any provision of law to be guilty of
200 perjury or otherwise giving a false statement by reason of
201 his or her failure to recite or acknowledge such arrests,
202 pleas, trials, convictions, or expungement in response to an
203 inquiry made of him or her and no such inquiry shall be made
204 for information relating to an expungement, except the
205 petitioner shall disclose the expunged crime to any court
206 when asked or upon being charged with any subsequent crime.
207 The expunged crime may be considered a prior offense in
208 determining a sentence to be imposed for any subsequent
209 offense that the person is found guilty of committing.
210 10. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 9 of
211 this section to the contrary, a person granted an
212 expungement shall disclose any expunged crime when the
213 disclosure of such information is necessary to complete any
214 application for:
215 (1) A license, certificate, or permit issued by this
216 state to practice such individual's profession;
217 (2) Any license issued under chapter 313 or permit
218 issued under chapter 571;

SB 1356 10
219 (3) Paid or unpaid employment with an entity licensed
220 under chapter 313, any state-operated lottery, or any
221 emergency services provider, including any law enforcement
222 agency;
223 (4) Employment with any federally insured bank or
224 savings institution or credit union or an affiliate of such
225 institution or credit union for the purposes of compliance
226 with 12 U.S.C. Section 1829 and 12 U.S.C. Section 1785;
227 (5) Employment with any entity engaged in the business
228 of insurance or any insurer for the purpose of complying
229 with 18 U.S.C. Section 1033, 18 U.S.C. Section 1034, or
230 other similar law which requires an employer engaged in the
231 business of insurance to exclude applicants with certain
232 criminal convictions from employment; or
233 (6) Employment with any employer that is required to
234 exclude applicants with certain criminal convictions from
235 employment due to federal or state law, including
236 corresponding rules and regulations.
237 An employer shall notify an applicant of the requirements
238 under subdivisions (4) to (6) of this subsection.
239 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an
240 expunged crime shall not be grounds for automatic
241 disqualification of an applicant, but may be a factor for
242 denying employment, or a professional license, certificate,
243 or permit; except that, a crime expunged under the
244 provisions of this section may be grounds for automatic
245 disqualification if the application is for employment under
246 subdivisions (4) to (6) of this subsection.
247 11. A person who has been granted an expungement of
248 records pertaining to a crime may answer "no" to an
249 employer's inquiry into whether the person has ever been

SB 1356 11
250 arrested, charged, or convicted of a crime if, after the
251 granting of the expungement, the person has no public record
252 of a crime. The person, however, shall answer such an
253 inquiry affirmatively and disclose his or her criminal
254 convictions, including any offense expunged under this
255 section or similar law, if the employer is required to
256 exclude applicants with certain criminal convictions from
257 employment due to federal or state law, including
258 corresponding rules and regulations.
259 12. If the court determines that the petitioner has
260 not met the criteria for any of the crimes listed in the
261 petition for expungement or the petitioner has knowingly
262 provided false information in the petition, the court shall
263 enter an order dismissing the petition. Any person whose
264 petition for expungement has been dismissed by the court for
265 failure to meet the criteria set forth in subsection 6 of
266 this section may not refile another petition until a year
267 has passed since the date of filing for the previous
268 petition.
269 13. A person may be granted more than one expungement
270 under this section provided that during his or her lifetime,
271 the total number of crimes for which orders of expungement
272 are granted to the person shall not exceed the following
273 limits:
274 (1) Not more than three misdemeanor offenses or
275 ordinance violations that have an authorized term of
276 imprisonment; and
277 (2) Not more than two felony offenses.
278 A person may be granted expungement under this section for
279 any number of infractions. Nothing in this section shall be
280 construed to limit or impair in any way the subsequent use

SB 1356 12
281 of any record expunged under this section of any arrests or
282 findings of guilt by a law enforcement agency, criminal
283 justice agency, prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney,
284 including its use as a prior crime.
285 14. The court shall make available a form for pro se
286 petitioners seeking expungement, which shall include the
287 following statement: "I declare under penalty of perjury
288 that the statements made herein are true and correct to the
289 best of my knowledge, information, and belief.".
290 15. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
291 limit or restrict the availability of expungement to any
292 person under any other law.
✓